West Virginia, session 2026, HB4805.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. accidents. §17C-4-18. Environmental cleanup for crashes. (a) In the event of a motor vehicle crash, or any other environmental hazard, any first responder who arrives on the scene may notify the public safety answering point (PAP) and request a West Virginia Department of Environmental Protection ("DEP") approved, environmental cleanup company to respond to the scene, in the event of hazardous materials being released into the environment.(b) Should a first responder contact a DEP approved, environmental cleanup company through the provision set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the DEP shall ensure the containment, cleanup, and reclamation takes place in a timely and satisfactory manner.